Utah statutes.
19-2-110.   Violations -- Notice to violator -- Corrective action orders -- Conference, conciliation, and persuasion by director -- Hearings.

(1)  Whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule issued under it has occurred, the director may serve written notice of the violation upon the alleged violator.  The notice shall specify the provision of this chapter or rule alleged to be violated, the facts alleged to constitute the violation, and may include an order that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time.

(2)  Nothing in this chapter prevents the director from making efforts to obtain voluntary compliance through warning, conference, conciliation, persuasion, or other appropriate means.

(3)  Hearings may be held before an administrative law judge as provided by Section 19-1-301.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

